Washington statutes.
RCW 3.66.065

Assessment of punishment.

If a defendant is found guilty, a judge holding office pursuant to chapters 3.30 through 3.74 RCW, or chapter 35.20 RCW, and not the jury, shall assess punishment, notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 10.04.100. If the judge determines that the punishment authorized is inadequate compared to the gravity of the offense he or she may order such defendant to enter recognizance to appear in the superior court of the county and may also recognize the witnesses and shall proceed as a committing magistrate.

[ 1984 c 258 s 45; 1975 c 29 s 1; 1965 ex.s. c 110 s 7.]

NOTES:

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.

Sentence and judgment: Rules of court: CrRLJ 7.2.